Maine, session 132, LD2132.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §82, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 220, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Licenses required. An ambulance service, ambulance, nontransporting emergency
medical service, emergency medical services person, emergency medical services
ambulance operator, emergency medical services educator, emergency medical services
training center, emergency medical dispatch center or emergency medical dispatcher may
not operate or practice unless duly licensed by the Emergency Medical Services' Board
pursuant to this chapter, except as stated in subsection 2.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §82, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2007, c. 274, §3, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §82, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Unlicensed practice; criminal penalties. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, a person that practices or represents to the public that the person is authorized
to practice or engage in an activity that requires a license under this section and
intentionally, knowingly or recklessly fails to obtain a license as required under this section
or intentionally, knowingly or recklessly practices or represents to the public that the person
is authorized to practice or engages in an activity that requires a license after the license
required under this section has expired or has been suspended or revoked commits a Class
E crime.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §82, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Unlicensed practice; civil violations. A person that practices or represents to the
public that the person is authorized to practice or engage in an activity that requires a license
under this section and fails to obtain a license as required under this section or practices or
represents to the public that the person is authorized to practice or engage in an activity that
Page 1 - 132LR2887(03)

requires a license after the license required under this section has expired or has been
suspended or revoked commits a civil violation punishable by a fine of not less than $1,000
but not more than $5,000 for each violation. An action under this subsection may be
brought in the District Court or, in combination with an action under subsection 6, in the
Superior Court.
Sec. 5. 32 MRSA §82, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Unlicensed practice; injunctions. The Attorney General may bring an action in
the Superior Court to enjoin any person from violating subsection 5, whether or not
proceedings have been or may be instituted in the District Court or whether or not criminal
proceedings have been or may be instituted, and to restore to any person that has suffered
any ascertainable loss by reason of that violation any money or personal or real property
that may have been acquired by means of that violation and to compel the return of
compensation received for engaging in that unlawful conduct.
A person that violates the terms of an injunction issued under this subsection shall pay to
the State a fine of not more than $10,000 for each violation. In any action under this
subsection, when a permanent injunction has been issued, the court may order the person
against whom the permanent injunction is issued to pay to the General Fund the costs of
the investigation of that person by the Attorney General and the costs of suit, including
attorney's fees. In any action by the Attorney General brought against a person for violating
the terms of an injunction issued under this subsection, the court may make the necessary
orders or judgments to restore to any person that has suffered any ascertainable loss of
money or personal or real property or to compel the return of compensation received by
reason of such conduct found to be in violation of an injunction.
Sec. 6. 32 MRSA §83, sub-§12-B is enacted to read:
12-B. Emergency medical services educator. "Emergency medical services
educator" means a lead instructor of an emergency medical services licensure program.
Sec. 7. 32 MRSA §83, sub-§20, as amended by PL 2007, c. 274, §7, is further
amended to read:
20. Regional council. "Regional council" means a business an entity recognized by
the board that represents a geographical area of the State, as designated by the board, with
respect to matters subject to this chapter.
Sec. 8. State Trauma Prevention and Control Advisory Committee report.
The Director of Maine Emergency Medical Services within the Department of Public
Safety, or the director's designee, shall convene the State Trauma Prevention and Control
Advisory Committee under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 32, section 87-A, subsection
2 to evaluate opportunities to enhance the State's trauma care system and to share uniform
quality data as it relates to injury-related incidents. By September 1, 2027, the director shall
submit a report with the findings of the advisory committee to the joint standing committee
of the Legislature having jurisdiction over emergency medical services matters. The joint
standing committee may report out legislation to the Second Regular Session of the 133rd
Legislature based on the report.
Page 2 - 132LR2887(03)